Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HCR2007.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona:
Section 1. Title 15, chapter 9, article 1, Arizona
Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-917, to
read:
15-917. Operational spending; direct instructional
expenses; enforcement; waivers
A. EACH SCHOOL DISTRICT THAT HAS A STUDENT COUNT OF AT
LEAST [SEVEN THOUSAND] FIVE HUNDRED [OR THAT OPERATES A SCHOOL
IN A COUNTY WITH A POPULATION OF AT LEAST FIVE HUNDRED
THOUSAND PERSONS] SHALL[:
1.] SPEND AT LEAST SIXTY PERCENT OF THE SCHOOL
DISTRICT'S OPERATIONAL SPENDING ON DIRECT INSTRUCTIONAL
EXPENSES.
[2. SPEND AT LEAST FIFTY PERCENT OF THE SCHOOL
DISTRICT'S OPERATIONAL SPENDING ON TEACHER PAY.
B.] BEGINNING IN FISCAL YEAR 2027-2028, ANY SCHOOL
DISTRICT THAT [IS NOT COMPLYING WITH SUBSECTION A OF THIS
SECTION] [SPENDS LESS THAN SIXTY PERCENT OF THE SCHOOL
DISTRICT'S OPERATIONAL SPENDING ON DIRECT INSTRUCTIONAL
EXPENSES] SHALL INCREASE THE PORTION OF THE SCHOOL DISTRICT'S
OPERATIONAL SPENDING THAT IS SPENT ON DIRECT INSTRUCTIONAL
EXPENSES [OR TEACHER PAY, OR BOTH,] EACH YEAR BY AT LEAST

House Amendments to H.C.R. 2007
ONE-HALF OF ONE PERCENT [OF THE PORTION OF THE SCHOOL
DISTRICT'S OPERATIONAL SPENDING THAT IS SPENT ON DIRECT
INSTRUCTIONAL EXPENSES OR TEACHER PAY, OR BOTH, IN THE
2024-2025 SCHOOL] [PER] YEAR UNTIL THE SCHOOL DISTRICT IS IN
COMPLIANCE[, SUBJECT TO THE FOLLOWING:] [. ]
[1.] IF A SCHOOL DISTRICT INCREASES THE PORTION OF THE
SCHOOL DISTRICT'S OPERATIONAL SPENDING [REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION
A OF THIS SECTION] [ON DIRECT INSTRUCTIONAL EXPENSES] BY MORE
THAN ONE-HALF OF ONE PERCENT [IN ANY] [PER] YEAR, THE SCHOOL
DISTRICT MAY COUNT THE PORTION OF THE INCREASE THAT EXCEEDS
ONE-HALF OF ONE PERCENT TOWARD ANY INCREASE THAT IS REQUIRED
IN A SUBSEQUENT YEAR. [A SCHOOL DISTRICT SHALL USE
UNRESTRICTED OPERATIONAL SPENDING TO COMPLY WITH THIS
SUBSECTION AND MAY NOT COUNT EXPENDITURES FROM THE DIRECT
INSTRUCTION FUND IN THE INCREASES REQUIRED BY THIS
SUBSECTION.]
[2. IF A SCHOOL DISTRICT REDUCES THE PORTION OF THE
SCHOOL DISTRICT'S OPERATIONAL SPENDING ON DIRECT INSTRUCTIONAL
EXPENSES, BOTH OF THE FOLLOWING APPLY:
(a) THE AUDITOR GENERAL MAY NOT CONSIDER THE REDUCTION
WHEN CALCULATING THE AMOUNT OF THE ANNUAL INCREASE THAT IS
REQUIRED BY THIS SUBSECTION FOR THE SCHOOL DISTRICT.
(b) THE SCHOOL DISTRICT MAY COUNT ONLY THE PORTION OF
AN INCREASE IN OPERATIONAL SPENDING ON DIRECT INSTRUCTIONAL
EXPENSES FOR A SUBSEQUENT YEAR THAT RESULTS IN AN INCREASE
ABOVE THE PORTION OF OPERATIONAL SPENDING BEFORE THE
REDUCTION.]
[C.] [B.] IF [IN THE ANNUAL REPORT REQUIRED BY SECTION
41-1279.03,] THE AUDITOR GENERAL [IDENTIFIES] [DETERMINES
THAT] A SCHOOL DISTRICT [THAT] DID NOT COMPLY WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS PRESCRIBED BY SUBSECTION [B ] [A] OF THIS SECTION
[IN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR AND IF THE SCHOOL
DISTRICT RECEIVES MONIES FROM THE CLASSROOM SITE FUND
ESTABLISHED BY SECTION 15-977], [THE AUDITOR GENERAL SHALL
NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION AND:
1. IN THE NEXT FISCAL YEAR AFTER THE AUDITOR GENERAL
NOTIFIES THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
WITHHOLD FROM THE STATE AID THAT THE SCHOOL DISTRICT WOULD
OTHERWISE RECEIVE AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE GREATER OF:
(a) THE DIFFERENCE BETWEEN THE AMOUNT THAT THE SCHOOL
DISTRICT WAS REQUIRED TO SPEND ON DIRECT INSTRUCTIONAL
EXPENSES PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION B OF THIS SECTION AND THE
AMOUNT THAT THE SCHOOL DISTRICT ACTUALLY SPENT ON DIRECT
INSTRUCTIONAL EXPENSES FOR THE SCHOOL YEAR THAT IS THE SUBJECT
OF THE AUDITOR GENERAL'S DETERMINATION.
(b) THE DIFFERENCE BETWEEN THE AMOUNT THAT THE SCHOOL
DISTRICT WAS REQUIRED TO SPEND ON TEACHER PAY PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION A OF THIS SECTION AND THE AMOUNT THAT THE SCHOOL
DISTRICT ACTUALLY SPENT ON TEACHER PAY FOR THE SCHOOL YEAR
THAT IS THE SUBJECT OF THE AUDITOR GENERAL'S DETERMINATION.
-2-

House Amendments to H.C.R. 2007
2. IF THE SCHOOL DISTRICT IS SUBJECT TO A WITHHOLDING
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION, THE SCHOOL DISTRICT SHALL
ESTABLISH A DIRECT INSTRUCTION FUND. THE SCHOOL DISTRICT
SHALL USE MONIES FROM THE FUND ONLY FOR DIRECT INSTRUCTIONAL
EXPENSES.
3.] THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REDUCE THE SCHOOL DISTRICT'S
[GENERAL BUDGET LIMIT CALCULATED] [ALLOCATION] PURSUANT TO
SECTION [15-947] [15-977, SUBSECTION G FOR THE BUDGET YEAR] BY
THE [TOTAL AMOUNT THAT IS WITHHELD PURSUANT TO PARAGRAPH 1 OF
THIS SUBSECTION.
4. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL RETURN TO THE SCHOOL DISTRICT
MONIES THAT ARE WITHHELD PURSUANT TO PARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS
SUBSECTION AND THE SCHOOL DISTRICT SHALL DEPOSIT THE MONIES IN
THE DIRECT INSTRUCTION FUND 2 OF THIS SUBSECTION.
D. THE AUDITOR GENERAL SHALL:
1. ANNUALLY DETERMINE WHETHER EACH SCHOOL DISTRICT IN
THIS STATE IS IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS PRESCRIBED
BY SUBSECTION C, PARAGRAPH 2 OF THIS SECTION AND SHALL REPORT
THE DETERMINATIONS TO THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION, THE
GOVERNOR, THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES, THE
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE AND THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE BUDGET
COMMITTEE.
2. DEFINE OPERATIONAL SPENDING FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS
SECTION.] [FOLLOWING AMOUNTS:
1. IF THE SCHOOL DISTRICT DID NOT COMPLY FOR ONE YEAR,
AN AMOUNT THAT IS EQUAL TO TWENTY-FIVE PERCENT OF THE AMOUNT
THAT WOULD OTHERWISE BE ALLOCATED TO THE SCHOOL DISTRICT.
2. IF THE SCHOOL DISTRICT DID NOT COMPLY FOR TWO YEARS,
AN AMOUNT THAT IS EQUAL TO FIFTY PERCENT OF THE AMOUNT THAT
WOULD OTHERWISE BE ALLOCATED TO THE SCHOOL DISTRICT.
3. IF THE SCHOOL DISTRICT DID NOT COMPLY FOR THREE
YEARS, AN AMOUNT THAT IS EQUAL TO SEVENTY-FIVE PERCENT OF THE
AMOUNT THAT WOULD OTHERWISE BE ALLOCATED TO THE DISTRICT.
4. IF THE SCHOOL DISTRICT DID NOT COMPLY FOR AT LEAST
FOUR YEARS, AN AMOUNT THAT IS EQUAL TO THE AMOUNT THAT WOULD
OTHERWISE BE ALLOCATED TO THE DISTRICT.
C. THE STAFF OF THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE BUDGET COMMITTEE
SHALL INCLUDE MONIES THAT ARE NOT DISTRIBUTED BECAUSE OF
REDUCTIONS REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION B OF THIS SECTION IN THE
CARRYFORWARD FOR THE PURPOSES OF SECTION 15-977, SUBSECTION G,
PARAGRAPH 1.]
[E.] [D.] THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION MAY
WAIVE THE REQUIREMENTS PRESCRIBED BY SUBSECTION [C ] [B] OF
THIS SECTION FOR A SCHOOL DISTRICT SUBJECT TO THE FOLLOWING:
1. THE DURATION OF A WAIVER PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION
MAY NOT EXCEED ONE YEAR.
2. THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION MAY NOT
ISSUE [A WAIVER] [MORE THAN TWO WAIVERS] FOR A SCHOOL DISTRICT
[FOR MORE THAN TWO CONSECUTIVE YEARS.
F. FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, "TEACHER PAY":
-3-

House Amendments to H.C.R. 2007
1. INCLUDES:
(a) MONIES SPENT BY A SCHOOL DISTRICT FOR TEACHER BASE
SALARIES, PERFORMANCE PAY AND OTHER PAYMENTS TO TEACHERS THAT
ARE NOT RELATED TO COCURRICULAR ACTIVITIES, ATHLETICS OR OTHER
ADDITIONAL DUTIES AS DEFINED BY THE UNIFORM SYSTEM OF
FINANCIAL RECORDS.
(b) MONIES SPENT BY A SCHOOL DISTRICT FOR EMPLOYEE
BENEFITS THAT TEACHERS RECEIVE.
2. DOES NOT INCLUDE PAYMENTS TO OR COSTS INCURRED FOR
BENEFITS THAT ARE PROVIDED TO SUBSTITUTE TEACHERS OR
CONTRACTED TEACHERS.] [DURING ANY TEN-YEAR PERIOD, EXCEPT AS
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH 3 OF THIS SUBSECTION.
3. IF THE SUPERINTENDENT ISSUES A SECOND WAIVER FOR A
SCHOOL DISTRICT MORE THAN FOUR YEARS AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH
THE SUPERINTENDENT ISSUES A FIRST WAIVER FOR THE SCHOOL
DISTRICT, THE SUPERINTENDENT MAY ISSUE ANOTHER WAIVER FOR THE
SCHOOL DISTRICT AT ANY TIME DURING THE TEN-YEAR PERIOD THAT
BEGINS ON THE DATE THAT THE SUPERINTENDENT ISSUES THE SECOND
WAIVER.
E. THIS SECTION DOES NOT REQUIRE THIS STATE OR AN
OFFICER OR AGENCY OF THIS STATE TO MAINTAIN THE CLASSROOM SITE
FUND ESTABLISHED BY SECTION 15-977 OR ALLOCATE MONIES FOR A
CLASSROOM SITE FUND EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED BY THE LAWS
OF THIS STATE.
F. THE AUDITOR GENERAL SHALL DEFINE "DIRECT
INSTRUCTIONAL EXPENSES" AND "OPERATIONAL SPENDING" FOR THE
PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION.]
2. The Secretary of State shall submit this proposition to the
voters at the next general election as provided by article IV, part 1,
section 1, Constitution of Arizona."
Enroll and engross to conform
Amend title to conform
MATT GRESS
HCR2007FloorGRESS2.docx
03/17/2026
5:40 PM
C: VS
130YSYLEH
-4-